Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1018.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 12-3101, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE12-3101. Definition of foreign law In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, "foreign law": 1. Means either of the following: (a) Sharia law. (b) Any law, rule or legal code or system other than the constitution, laws and ratified treaties of the United States and the territories of the United States,  or the constitution and laws of this state. 2. Includes a foreign, religious or cultural law, custom or practice that allows, condones or excuses any of the following: (a) The honor killing of a person or honor-based violence. (b) A forced or coerced marriage. (c) A marriage involving a minor that violates a law in this state. (d) Female genital mutilation or cutting. (e) The physical punishment of a minor that constitutes abuse pursuant to the laws of this state. (f) Domestic violence or spousal abuse that is justified by cultural, religious or family authority. (g) Restricting a person's liberty or rights if based on gender, religion or family honor. (h) Denying a person equal protection or due process. (i) Polygamy where prohibited by the laws of this state. (j) Any conduct that violates a criminal law in this state. END_STATUTE